util_lex_parts/lex.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Pl +Sg 
+V +PS +PP +FP +PC +FC +FS +PR
+AJ +Cm +Sp +Rg
+NS1 +NS2 +NS3 +NS4 +NS5 +NS6 +NS7 +NS8 +NS9 +NS10 +NS11 +NS12 +NS13 +NS14 +NS15
+AS1 +AS2 +AS3 +AS4 +AS5 +AS6 +AS7 +AS8 +AS9 +AS10 +AS11
+ADV1 +ADV2 +ADV3
+VS1 +VS2 +VS3 +VS4   

LEXICON Root
Prefix  ;
Noun	;
Verb	;
Adj	;
ADV	;
Closed  ;

LEXICON Noun
NREG	;
NIRG	;

LEXICON Adj
AREG	;
AIRG	;

LEXICON Verb
VREG	;
VIRG	;

LEXICON NEnd
+N+Pl:^s	#;
+N+Sg:0		#;

LEXICON VEnd
+V+PS:^ed	#;
+V+PP:^ed	#;
+V+FP:^ed	#;
+V+PC:^ing	#;
+V+FC:^ing	#;
+V+FS:0	#;
+V+PR:0	#;
+V+PR3:^s	#;
VNSuf   ;
VASuf   ;

LEXICON AEnd
+AJ+Cm:^er	#;
+AJ+Sp:^est	#;
+AJ+Rg:0	#;

LEXICON Prefix
UniPref	;
VPref	;
NPref	;
APref	;

LEXICON VPref
over^	Verb;
fore^	Verb;
pre^	Verb;
de^	Verb;
be^	Verb;
un^	Verb;
under^	Verb;
sub^	Verb;
inter^	Verb;
co^	Verb;
re^	Verb;
mis^	Verb;
out^	Verb;

LEXICON NPref
anti^	Noun;
auto^	Noun;
bi^	Noun;
ex^	Noun;
sur^	Noun;
pseudo^	Noun;
semi^	Noun;
neo^	Noun;
poly^	Noun;
mini^	Noun;
mono^	Noun;
tele^	Noun;
super^	Noun;
tri^	Noun;
kilo^	Noun;
mega^	Noun;
hyper^	Noun;
counter^	Noun;
vice^	Noun;
super^	Noun;
ultra^	Noun;
in^	Noun;
re^	Noun;
mis^	Noun;
out^	Noun;
co^	Noun;
inter^	Noun;
sub^	Noun;
under^	Noun;

LEXICON APref
non^	Adj;
ir^	Adj;
im^	Adj;
il^	Adj;
in^	Adj;
un^	Adj;

LEXICON UniPref
dis^	Noun;
dis^	Adj;
dis^	Verb;
0	Noun;
0	Adj;
0	Verb;

LEXICON VIRG
V1unique	;
V2unique	;
V3unique	;

LEXICON VREnd
+V+PC:^ing	#;
+V+FC:^ing	#;
+V+FS:0	#;
+V+PR:0	#;

LEXICON NSuf
+NS1:^age	NEnd;
+NS2:^dom	NEnd;
+NS3:^hood	NEnd;
+NS4:^ism	NEnd;
+NS5:^ist	NEnd;
+NS6:^ship	NEnd;
NASuf   ;
NVSuf   ;
ADVSuf  ;

LEXICON ASuf
+AS1:^al	#;
+AS2:^ly	#;
+AS3:^ish	#;
+AS4:^ive	#;
ANSuf   ;
AVSuf   ;
ADVSuf  ;

LEXICON ADVSuf
+N+ADV1:^wise	#;
+N+ADV2:^ward	#;
+N+ADV3:^wards	#;
+A+ADV1:^ly	#;

LEXICON AIRG
Noun	NASuf;
Verb	VASuf;
Adj ASuf;
AIRGf	;

LEXICON AIRGf
good+AR+Rg:good	#;
good+AR+Cm:better	#;
good+AR+Sp:best	#;
bad+AR+Rg:bad	#;
bad+AR+Cm:worse	#;
bad+AR+Sp:worst	#;
little+AR+Rg:little	#;
little+AR+Cm:less	#;
little+AR+Sp:least	#;
far+AR+Rg:far	#;
far+AR+Cm:further	#;
far+AR+Sp:furthest	#;
far+AR+Cm:farther	#;
far+AR+Sp:farthest	#;

LEXICON NVSuf
+N+VS1:^ate	VEnd;
+N+VS2:^ise	VEnd;
+N+VS3:^ize	VEnd;
+N+VS4:^ify	VEnd;

LEXICON AVSuf
+A+VS1:^ate	VEnd;
+A+VS2:^ise	VEnd;
+A+VS3:^ize	VEnd;

LEXICON ANSuf
+A+NS1:^cy	NEnd;
+A+NS2:^dom	NEnd;
+A+NS3:^ness	NEnd;
+A+NS4:^ist	NEnd;
+A+NS5:^ism	NEnd;
+A+NS6:^ty	NEnd;
+A+NS7:^ity	NEnd;

LEXICON VNSuf
+V+NS1:^age	NEnd;
+V+NS2:^al	NEnd;
+V+NS3:^ance	NEnd;
+V+NS4:^ence	NEnd;
+V+NS5:^er	NEnd;
+V+NS6:^or	NEnd;
+V+NS7:^ee	NEnd;
+V+NS8:^ment	NEnd;
+V+NS9:^ry	NEnd;
+V+NS10:^ery	NEnd;
+V+NS11:^sion	NEnd;
+V+NS12:^tion	NEnd;
+V+NS13:^xion	NEnd;
+V+NS14:^ant	NEnd;
+V+NS15:^ent	NEnd;

LEXICON VASuf
+V+AS1:^y	#;
+V+AS2:^al	#;
+V+AS3:^less	#;
+V+AS4:^ing	#;
+V+AS5:^ic	#;
+V+AS6:^ive	#;
+V+AS7:^able	#;
+V+AS8:^ible	#;

LEXICON NASuf
+N+AS1:^y	#;
+N+AS2:^al	#;
+N+AS3:^ial	#;
+N+AS4:^ly	#;
+N+AS5:^ish	#;
+N+AS6:^ic	#;
+N+AS7:^some	#;
+N+AS8:^ful	#;
+N+AS9:^able	#;
+N+AS10:^ful	#;
+N+AS11:^ous	#;

LEXICON NIRG
aircraft+NR+Pl:aircraft	#;
aircraft+NR+Sg:aircraft	#;
alumna+NR+Pl:alumnae	#;
alumnae+NR+Sg:alumna	#;
bison+NR+Pl:bison	#;
bison+NR+Sg:bison	#;
child+NR+Pl:children	#;
children+NR+Sg:child	#;
foot+NR+Pl:feet	#;
feet+NR+Sg:foot	#;
goose+NR+Pl:geese	#;
geese+NR+Sg:goose	#;
graffito+NR+Pl:graffiti	#;
graffiti+NR+Sg:graffito	#;
louse+NR+Pl:lice	#;
lice+NR+Sg:louse	#;
man+NR+Pl:men	#;
men+NR+Sg:man	#;
minutia+NR+Pl:minutiae	#;
minutiae+NR+Sg:minutia	#;
moose+NR+Pl:moose	#;
moose+NR+Sg:moose	#;
mouse+NR+Pl:mice	#;
mice+NR+Sg:mouse	#;
ox+NR+Pl:oxen	#;
oxen+NR+Sg:ox	#;
sheep+NR+Pl:sheep	#;
sheep+NR+Sg:sheep	#;
swine+NR+Pl:swine	#;
swine+NR+Sg:swine	#;
tooth+NR+Pl:teeth	#;
teeth+NR+Sg:tooth	#;
vita+NR+Pl:vitae	#;
vitae+NR+Sg:vita	#;
woman+NR+Pl:women	#;
women+NR+Sg:woman	#;
